Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6165.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 32. "Micromobility device" means a device with 1 or more wheels designed to carry 1 operator and that is propelled by fuel, a battery, or other engine, or by the combination of a propulsion method and the operator. A micromobility device is not a bicycle, electric bicycle, or moped. Sec. 662b. (1) Beginning 12 months after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, a manufacturer or distributor of micromobility devices that are offered for sale or distribution in this state shall permanently affix in a prominent location on the micromobility device a label that contains the top speed and motor wattage of the micromobility device. The label required under this subsection shall be printed in arial font and must be at least 9-point type. (2) A person shall not tamper with or modify a micromobility device so as to change the manufactured motor-powered speed capability or motor engagement of the micromobility device without replacing the label required under subsection (1) with an appropriate label printed in arial font and in at least 9-point type. (3) As used in this section, "micromobility device" means that term as defined in section 32. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S05384'25) or House Bill No. 6166 (request no. H05384'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.